Arkansas, session 2025, HB1126.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. REGULAR SALARIES. There is hereby established for the
Department of Education - Office of Early Childhood for the 2025-2026 fiscal
year, the following maximum number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) N249N DHS DIVISION DIRECTOR 1 GRADE SE02
(2) D061C INFORMATION SYSTEMS COORD SPECIALIST 2 GRADE IT05
(3) D057C INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY MANAGER 1 GRADE IT05
(4) D062C DATABASE ANALYST 1 GRADE IT04
(5) D071C COMPUTER SUPPORT ANALYST 1 GRADE IT03
(6) D075C SOFTWARE SUPPORT SPECIALIST 1 GRADE IT03
*KMW011*
01/14/2025 4:05:45 PM KMW011

HB1126
(7) N122N DHS/DCC ASSIST DIR FINANCE & ADMIN 1 GRADE GS14
(8) G056C DHS/DCC ASST DIR OPS & PROG SUPV 3 GRADE GS13
(9) E013C EDUCATION PROGRAM MANAGER 2 GRADE GS10
(10) G099C DHS PROGRAM ADMINISTRATOR 6 GRADE GS09
(11) A082C ACCOUNTANT II 1 GRADE GS08
(12) G152C DHS PROGRAM MANAGER 14 GRADE GS08
(13) R014C PERSONNEL MANAGER 1 GRADE GS08
(14) X062C QUALITY ASSURANCE COORDINATOR 5 GRADE GS08
(15) E023C TRAINING PROJECT MANAGER 1 GRADE GS08
(16) A089C ACCOUNTANT I 1 GRADE GS07
(17) G183C DHS PROGRAM COORDINATOR 21 GRADE GS07
(18) X125C FRAUD INVESTIGATOR COORDINATOR 4 GRADE GS07
(19) G147C GRANTS COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS07
(20) M025C PROGRAM ELIGIBILITY COORDINATOR I 1 GRADE GS07
(21) C037C ADMINISTRATIVE ANALYST 4 GRADE GS06
(22) M053C CHILD CARE SERVICE SPECIALIST 36 GRADE GS06
(23) G210C DHS PROGRAM SPECIALIST 3 GRADE GS06
(24) E038C EDUCATION & INSTRUCTION ANALYST 1 GRADE GS06
(25) M051C FAMILY SERVICE WORKER 3 GRADE GS06
(26) G214C GRANTS SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS06
(27) G178C POLICY DEVELOPMENT COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS06
(28) M066C PROGRAM ELIGIBILITY SPECIALIST 43 GRADE GS06
(29) X136C QUALITY ASSURANCE REVIEWER 1 GRADE GS06
(30) B076C RESEARCH PROJECT ANALYST 1 GRADE GS06
(31) C050C ADMINISTRATIVE SUPPORT SUPERVISOR 1 GRADE GS05
(32) A088C ASSETS COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS05
(33) V012C FEDERAL SURPLUS PROPERTY SUPV 1 GRADE GS05
(34) E051C STAFF DEVELOPMENT SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS05
(35) C056C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST III 6 GRADE GS04
(36) V022C PURCHASING TECHNICIAN 1 GRADE GS04
(37) C073C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST II 3 GRADE GS03
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 177

SECTION 2. EXTRA HELP - OPERATIONS. There is hereby authorized, for
the Department of Education - Office of Early Childhood for the 2025-2026
fiscal year, the following maximum number of part-time or temporary
01/14/2025 4:05:45 PM KMW011

HB1126
employees, to be known as "Extra Help", payable from funds appropriated
herein for such purposes: thirteen (13) temporary or part-time employees,
when needed, at rates of pay not to exceed those provided in the Uniform
Classification and Compensation Act, or its successor, or this act for the
appropriate classification.

SECTION 3. APPROPRIATION - OFFICE OF EARLY CHILDHOOD - OPERATIONS.
There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Education, to be payable
from the Child Care and Early Childhood Education Fund Account, for personal
services and operating expenses of the Department of Education - Office of
Early Childhood - Operations for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $1,482,755
(02) EXTRA HELP 20,000
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 668,974
(04) OVERTIME 4,850
(05) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 7,585,752
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 103,243
(C) PROF. FEES 3,000,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(06) GRANTS AND AID 2,500,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $15,365,574

SECTION 4. APPROPRIATION - OFFICE OF EARLY CHILDHOOD - OPERATIONS -
FEDERAL. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Education, to be
payable from the federal funds as designated by the Chief Fiscal Officer of
the State, for personal services, operating expenses, and grants of the
Department of Education - Office of Early Childhood - Operations - Federal
for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
01/14/2025 4:05:45 PM KMW011

HB1126
NO. 2025-2026
(01) EARLY CHILDHOOD FEDERAL EXPENSES $268,670,324

SECTION 5. APPROPRIATION - OFFICE OF EARLY CHILDHOOD - CHILD CARE
PROGRAM GRANTS AND EXPENSES. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department
of Education, to be payable from the Child Care Grant Fund Account, for
operating expenses and grants of the Department of Education - Office of
Early Childhood - Child Care Program Grants and Expenses for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) CHILD CARE PROGRAM GRANTS AND EXPENSES $9,000,000

SECTION 6. APPROPRIATION - OFFICE OF EARLY CHILDHOOD - LOAN GUARANTEES AND
GRANTS. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Education, to be
payable from the cash fund deposited in the State Treasury as determined by
the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for loan guarantees and grants of the
Department of Education - Office of Early Childhood - Loan Guarantees and
Grants for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) LOAN GUARANTEES & GRANTS $36,786

SECTION 7. APPROPRIATION - OFFICE OF EARLY CHILDHOOD - COMMODITY
DISTRIBUTION AND SALVAGE CONTAINER - CASH. There is hereby appropriated, to
the Department of Education, to be payable from the cash fund deposited in
the State Treasury as determined by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State,
for operating expenses of the Department of Education - Office of Early
Childhood - Commodity Distribution and Salvage Container - Cash for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
01/14/2025 4:05:45 PM KMW011

HB1126
(A) OPER. EXPENSE $130,186
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 9,490
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $139,676

SECTION 8. APPROPRIATION - OFFICE OF EARLY CHILDHOOD - CHILDCARE
FACILITY GRANTS. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of
Education, to be payable from the Child Care Fund, for providing grants to
childcare facilities as provided by law of the Department of Education -
Office of Early Childhood - Childcare Facility Grants for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) CHILDCARE FACILITY GRANTS $200,000

SECTION 9. COMPLIANCE WITH OTHER LAWS. Disbursement of funds
authorized by this act shall be limited to the appropriation for such agency
and funds made available by law for the support of such appropriations; and
the restrictions of the State Procurement Law, the General Accounting and
Budgetary Procedures Law, the Revenue Stabilization Law, the Regular Salary
Procedures and Restrictions Act, or their successors, and other fiscal
control laws of this State, where applicable, and regulations promulgated by
the Department of Finance and Administration, as authorized by law, shall be
strictly complied with in disbursement of said funds.

SECTION 10. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the General
Assembly that any funds disbursed under the authority of the appropriations
contained in this act shall be in compliance with the stated reasons for
which this act was adopted, as evidenced by the Agency Requests, Executive
Recommendations and Legislative Recommendations contained in the budget
manuals prepared by the Department of Finance and Administration, letters, or
summarized oral testimony in the official minutes of the Arkansas Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee which relate to its passage and adoption.
01/14/2025 4:05:45 PM KMW011

HB1126

SECTION 11. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits
the appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the
effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2025 is essential to the operation of
the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in
the event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the
effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2025 could work irreparable harm
upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental
programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act
being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health
and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2025.
























01/14/2025 4:05:45 PM KMW011